Washington statutes.
RCW 43.105.359

Electronic access to public records—Government information locator service pilot project.

The state library, with the assistance of the agency and the state archives, shall establish a pilot project to design and test an electronic information locator system, allowing members of the public to locate and access electronic public records. In designing the system, the following factors shall be considered: (1) Ease of operation by citizens; (2) access through multiple technologies, such as direct dial and toll-free numbers, kiosks, and the internet; (3) compatibility with private online services; and (4) capability of expanding the electronic public records included in the system. The pilot project may restrict the type and quality of electronic public records that are included in the system to test the feasibility of making electronic public records and information widely available to the public.

[ 2024 c 54 s 15; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 724; 1996 c 171 s 13. Formerly RCW 43.41A.135, 43.105.290.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Captions not law—Effective dates—1996 c 171: See notes following RCW 2.68.050.